Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-222.01
Director; serve at pleasure of board; salary; qualifications; bond or insurance; premium.

The director, under the supervision of the Board of Barber Examiners, shall administer the Barber Act and shall serve at the pleasure of the board. His or her salary shall be fixed by the board. The director shall devote full time to the duties of the office. No person shall be eligible to the office of director who has not been engaged in the active practice of barbering as a registered barber in the state for at least five years immediately preceding appointment. No member of the Board of Barber Examiners shall be eligible to the office of director during the member's term. The director shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201. The premium shall be paid as an expense of the board.

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 26, p. 1326;

Laws 1965, c. 417, § 7, p. 1333;

Laws 1971, LB 1020, § 27;

Laws 1978, LB 722, § 18;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 25;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 34;

Laws 2024, LB1215, § 25.